Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 9.1-102.
(Effective until January 1, 2023) Powers and duties of the Board and the Department.

The Department, under the direction of the Board, which shall be the policy-making body for carrying out the duties and powers hereunder, shall have the power and duty to:

Adopt regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.), for the administration of this chapter including the authority to require the submission of reports and information by law-enforcement officers within the Commonwealth. Any proposed regulations concerning the privacy, confidentiality, and security of criminal justice information shall be submitted for review and comment to any board, commission, or committee or other body which may be established by the General Assembly to regulate the privacy, confidentiality, and security of information collected and maintained by the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof;

Establish compulsory minimum training standards subsequent to employment as a law-enforcement officer in (i) permanent positions and (ii) temporary or probationary status and establish the time required for completion of such training. Such compulsory minimum training standards shall include crisis intervention training in accordance with clause (i) of §

9.1-188

;

Establish minimum training standards and qualifications for certification and recertification for law-enforcement officers serving as field training officers;

Establish compulsory minimum curriculum requirements for in-service and advanced courses and programs for schools, whether located in or outside the Commonwealth, which are operated for the specific purpose of training law-enforcement officers;

Establish (i) compulsory minimum training standards for law-enforcement officers who utilize radar or an electrical or microcomputer device to measure the speed of motor vehicles as provided in §

46.2-882

and establish the time required for completion of the training and (ii) compulsory minimum qualifications for certification and recertification of instructors who provide such training;

[Repealed];

Establish compulsory minimum entry-level, in-service and advanced training standards for those persons designated to provide courthouse and courtroom security pursuant to the provisions of §

53.1-120

, and to establish the time required for completion of such training;

Establish compulsory minimum entry-level, in-service and advanced training standards for deputy sheriffs designated to serve process pursuant to the provisions of §

8.01-293

, and establish the time required for the completion of such training;

Establish compulsory minimum entry-level, in-service, and advanced training standards, as well as the time required for completion of such training, for persons employed as deputy sheriffs and jail officers by local criminal justice agencies and correctional officers employed by the Department of Corrections under the provisions of Title 53.1. For correctional officers employed by the Department of Corrections, such standards shall include training on the general care of pregnant women, the impact of restraints on pregnant inmates and fetuses, the impact of being placed in restrictive housing or solitary confinement on pregnant inmates, and the impact of body cavity searches on pregnant inmates;

Establish compulsory minimum training standards for all dispatchers employed by or in any local or state government agency, whose duties include the dispatching of law-enforcement personnel. Such training standards shall apply only to dispatchers hired on or after July 1, 1988;

Establish compulsory minimum training standards for all auxiliary police officers employed by or in any local or state government agency. Such training shall be graduated and based on the type of duties to be performed by the auxiliary police officers. Such training standards shall not apply to auxiliary police officers exempt pursuant to §

15.2-1731

;

Consult and cooperate with counties, municipalities, agencies of the Commonwealth, other state and federal governmental agencies, and institutions of higher education within or outside the Commonwealth, concerning the development of police training schools and programs or courses of instruction;

Approve institutions, curricula and facilities, whether located in or outside the Commonwealth, for school operation for the specific purpose of training law-enforcement officers; but this shall not prevent the holding of any such school whether approved or not;

Establish and maintain police training programs through such agencies and institutions as the Board deems appropriate;

Establish compulsory minimum qualifications of certification and recertification for instructors in criminal justice training academies approved by the Department;

Conduct and stimulate research by public and private agencies which shall be designed to improve police administration and law enforcement;

Make recommendations concerning any matter within its purview pursuant to this chapter;

Coordinate its activities with those of any interstate system for the exchange of criminal history record information, nominate one or more of its members to serve upon the council or committee of any such system, and participate when and as deemed appropriate in any such system’s activities and programs;

Conduct inquiries and investigations it deems appropriate to carry out its functions under this chapter and, in conducting such inquiries and investigations, may require any criminal justice agency to submit information, reports, and statistical data with respect to its policy and operation of information systems or with respect to its collection, storage, dissemination, and usage of criminal history record information and correctional status information, and such criminal justice agencies shall submit such information, reports, and data as are reasonably required;

Conduct audits as required by §

9.1-131

;

Conduct a continuing study and review of questions of individual privacy and confidentiality of criminal history record information and correctional status information;

Advise criminal justice agencies and initiate educational programs for such agencies with respect to matters of privacy, confidentiality, and security as they pertain to criminal history record information and correctional status information;

Maintain a liaison with any board, commission, committee, or other body which may be established by law, executive order, or resolution to regulate the privacy and security of information collected by the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof;

Adopt regulations establishing guidelines and standards for the collection, storage, and dissemination of criminal history record information and correctional status information, and the privacy, confidentiality, and security thereof necessary to implement state and federal statutes, regulations, and court orders;

Operate a statewide criminal justice research center, which shall maintain an integrated criminal justice information system, produce reports, provide technical assistance to state and local criminal justice data system users, and provide analysis and interpretation of criminal justice statistical information;

Develop a comprehensive, statewide, long-range plan for strengthening and improving law enforcement and the administration of criminal justice throughout the Commonwealth, and periodically update that plan;

Cooperate with, and advise and assist, all agencies, departments, boards and institutions of the Commonwealth, and units of general local government, or combinations thereof, including planning district commissions, in planning, developing, and administering programs, projects, comprehensive plans, and other activities for improving law enforcement and the administration of criminal justice throughout the Commonwealth, including allocating and subgranting funds for these purposes;

Define, develop, organize, encourage, conduct, coordinate, and administer programs, projects and activities for the Commonwealth and units of general local government, or combinations thereof, in the Commonwealth, designed to strengthen and improve law enforcement and the administration of criminal justice at every level throughout the Commonwealth;

Review and evaluate programs, projects, and activities, and recommend, where necessary, revisions or alterations to such programs, projects, and activities for the purpose of improving law enforcement and the administration of criminal justice;

Coordinate the activities and projects of the state departments, agencies, and boards of the Commonwealth and of the units of general local government, or combination thereof, including planning district commissions, relating to the preparation, adoption, administration, and implementation of comprehensive plans to strengthen and improve law enforcement and the administration of criminal justice;

Do all things necessary on behalf of the Commonwealth and its units of general local government, to determine and secure benefits available under the Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act of 1968 (P.L. 90-351, 82 Stat. 197), as amended, and under any other federal acts and programs for strengthening and improving law enforcement, the administration of criminal justice, and delinquency prevention and control;

Receive, administer, and expend all funds and other assistance available to the Board and the Department for carrying out the purposes of this chapter and the Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act of 1968, as amended;

Apply for and accept grants from the United States government or any other source in carrying out the purposes of this chapter and accept any and all donations both real and personal, and grants of money from any governmental unit or public agency, or from any institution, person, firm or corporation, and may receive, utilize and dispose of the same. Any arrangements pursuant to this section shall be detailed in the annual report of the Board. Such report shall include the identity of the donor, the nature of the transaction, and the conditions, if any. Any moneys received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the state treasury to the account of the Department. To these ends, the Board shall have the power to comply with conditions and execute such agreements as may be necessary;

Make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and execution of its powers under this chapter, including but not limited to, contracts with the United States, units of general local government or combinations thereof, in Virginia or other states, and with agencies and departments of the Commonwealth;

Adopt and administer reasonable regulations for the planning and implementation of programs and activities and for the allocation, expenditure and subgranting of funds available to the Commonwealth and to units of general local government, and for carrying out the purposes of this chapter and the powers and duties set forth herein;

Certify and decertify law-enforcement officers in accordance with §§

15.2-1706

and

15.2-1707

;

Establish training standards and publish and periodically update model policies for law-enforcement personnel in the following subjects:

The handling of family abuse, domestic violence, sexual assault, and stalking cases, including standards for determining the predominant physical aggressor in accordance with §

19.2-81.3

. The Department shall provide technical support and assistance to law-enforcement agencies in carrying out the requirements set forth in subsection A of §

9.1-1301

;

Communication with and facilitation of the safe return of individuals diagnosed with Alzheimer’s disease;

Sensitivity to and awareness of systemic and individual racism, cultural diversity, and the potential for racially biased policing and bias-based profiling as defined in §

52-30.1

, which shall include recognizing implicit biases in interacting with persons who have a mental illness, substance use disorder, or developmental or cognitive disability;

Protocols for local and regional sexual assault response teams;

Communication of death notifications;

The questioning of individuals suspected of driving while intoxicated concerning the physical location of such individual’s last consumption of an alcoholic beverage and the communication of such information to the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority;

Vehicle patrol duties that embody current best practices for pursuits and for responding to emergency calls;

Criminal investigations that embody current best practices for conducting photographic and live lineups;

Sensitivity to and awareness of human trafficking offenses and the identification of victims of human trafficking offenses for personnel involved in criminal investigations or assigned to vehicle or street patrol duties;

The recognition, prevention, and reporting of human trafficking;

Missing children, missing adults, and search and rescue protocol; and

The handling and use of tear gas or other gases and kinetic impact munitions, as defined in §

19.2-83.3

, that embody current best practices for using such items as a crowd control measure or during an arrest or detention of another person;

Establish compulsory training standards for basic training and the recertification of law-enforcement officers to ensure (i) sensitivity to and awareness of systemic and individual racism, cultural diversity, and the potential for racially biased policing and bias-based profiling as defined in §

52-30.1

, which shall include recognizing implicit biases in interacting with persons who have a mental illness, substance use disorder, or developmental or cognitive disability; (ii) training in de-escalation techniques; and (iii) training in the lawful use of force, including the use of deadly force, as defined in §

19.2-83.3

, only when necessary to protect the law-enforcement officer or another person;

Review and evaluate community-policing programs in the Commonwealth, and recommend where necessary statewide operating procedures, guidelines, and standards that strengthen and improve such programs, including sensitivity to and awareness of systemic and individual racism, cultural diversity, and the potential for racially biased policing and bias-based profiling as defined in §

52-30.1

, which shall include recognizing implicit biases in interacting with persons who have a mental illness, substance use disorder, or developmental or cognitive disability;

Establish a Virginia Law-Enforcement Accreditation Center. The Center may, in cooperation with Virginia law-enforcement agencies, provide technical assistance and administrative support, including staffing, for the establishment of voluntary state law-enforcement accreditation standards. The Center may provide accreditation assistance and training, resource material, and research into methods and procedures that will assist the Virginia law-enforcement community efforts to obtain Virginia accreditation status;

Promote community policing philosophy and practice throughout the Commonwealth by providing community policing training and technical assistance statewide to all law-enforcement agencies, community groups, public and private organizations and citizens; developing and distributing innovative policing curricula and training tools on general community policing philosophy and practice and contemporary critical issues facing Virginia communities; serving as a consultant to Virginia organizations with specific community policing needs; facilitating continued development and implementation of community policing programs statewide through discussion forums for community policing leaders, development of law-enforcement instructors; promoting a statewide community policing initiative; and serving as a statewide information source on the subject of community policing including, but not limited to periodic newsletters, a website and an accessible lending library;

Establish, in consultation with the Department of Education and the Virginia State Crime Commission, compulsory minimum standards for employment and job-entry and in-service training curricula and certification requirements for school security officers, including school security officers described in clause (b) of § 22.1-280.2:1, which training and certification shall be administered by the Virginia Center for School and Campus Safety (VCSCS) pursuant to §

9.1-184

. Such training standards shall be specific to the role and responsibility of school security officers and shall include (i) relevant state and federal laws; (ii) school and personal liability issues; (iii) security awareness in the school environment; (iv) mediation and conflict resolution, including de-escalation techniques such as a physical alternative to restraint; (v) disaster and emergency response; (vi) awareness of systemic and individual racism, cultural diversity, and implicit bias; (vii) working with students with disabilities, mental health needs, substance use disorders, and past traumatic experiences; and (viii) student behavioral dynamics, including child and adolescent development and brain research. The Department shall establish an advisory committee consisting of local school board representatives, principals, superintendents, and school security personnel to assist in the development of the standards and certification requirements in this subdivision. The Department shall require any school security officer who carries a firearm in the performance of his duties to provide proof that he has completed a training course provided by a federal, state, or local law-enforcement agency that includes training in active shooter emergency response, emergency evacuation procedure, and threat assessment;

License and regulate property bail bondsmen and surety bail bondsmen in accordance with Article 11 (§

9.1-185

et seq.);

License and regulate bail enforcement agents in accordance with Article 12 (§

9.1-186

et seq.);

In conjunction with the Virginia State Police and the State Compensation Board, advise criminal justice agencies regarding the investigation, registration, and dissemination of information requirements as they pertain to the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry Act (§

9.1-900

et seq.);

Establish minimum standards for (i) employment, (ii) job-entry and in-service training curricula, and (iii) certification requirements for campus security officers. Such training standards shall include, but not be limited to, the role and responsibility of campus security officers, relevant state and federal laws, school and personal liability issues, security awareness in the campus environment, and disaster and emergency response. The Department shall provide technical support and assistance to campus police departments and campus security departments on the establishment and implementation of policies and procedures, including but not limited to: the management of such departments, investigatory procedures, judicial referrals, the establishment and management of databases for campus safety and security information sharing, and development of uniform record keeping for disciplinary records and statistics, such as campus crime logs, judicial referrals and Clery Act statistics. The Department shall establish an advisory committee consisting of college administrators, college police chiefs, college security department chiefs, and local law-enforcement officials to assist in the development of the standards and certification requirements and training pursuant to this subdivision;

Assess and report, in accordance with §

9.1-190

, the crisis intervention team programs established pursuant to §

9.1-187

;

In conjunction with the Office of the Attorney General, advise law-enforcement agencies and attorneys for the Commonwealth regarding the identification, investigation, and prosecution of human trafficking offenses using the common law and existing criminal statutes in the Code of Virginia;

Register tow truck drivers in accordance with §

46.2-116

and carry out the provisions of §

46.2-117

;

Administer the activities of the Virginia Sexual and Domestic Violence Program Professional Standards Committee by providing technical assistance and administrative support, including staffing, for the Committee;

In accordance with §

9.1-102.1

, design and approve the issuance of photo-identification cards to private security services registrants registered pursuant to Article 4 (§

9.1-138

et seq.);

In consultation with the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia and the Virginia Association of Campus Law Enforcement Administrators, develop multidisciplinary curricula on trauma-informed sexual assault investigation;

In consultation with the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, develop a model addiction recovery program that may be administered by sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, jail officers, administrators, or superintendents in any local or regional jail. Such program shall be based on any existing addiction recovery programs that are being administered by any local or regional jails in the Commonwealth. Participation in the model addiction recovery program shall be voluntary, and such program may address aspects of the recovery process, including medical and clinical recovery, peer-to-peer support, availability of mental health resources, family dynamics, and aftercare aspects of the recovery process;

Establish compulsory minimum training standards for certification and recertification of law-enforcement officers serving as school resource officers. Such training shall be specific to the role and responsibility of a law-enforcement officer working with students in a school environment and shall include (i) relevant state and federal laws; (ii) school and personal liability issues; (iii) security awareness in the school environment; (iv) mediation and conflict resolution, including de-escalation techniques; (v) disaster and emergency response; (vi) awareness of systemic and individual racism, cultural diversity, and implicit bias; (vii) working with students with disabilities, mental health needs, substance use disorders, or past traumatic experiences; and (viii) student behavioral dynamics, including current child and adolescent development and brain research;

Establish a model policy for the operation of body-worn camera systems as defined in §

15.2-1723.1

that also addresses the storage and maintenance of body-worn camera system records;

Establish compulsory minimum training standards for detector canine handlers employed by the Department of Corrections, standards for the training and retention of detector canines used by the Department of Corrections, and a central database on the performance and effectiveness of such detector canines that requires the Department of Corrections to submit comprehensive information on each canine handler and detector canine, including the number and types of calls and searches, substances searched for and whether or not detected, and the number of false positives, false negatives, true positives, and true negatives;

Establish compulsory training standards for basic training of law-enforcement officers for recognizing and managing stress, self-care techniques, and resiliency;

Establish guidelines and standards for psychological examinations conducted pursuant to subsection C of §

15.2-1705

;

Establish compulsory in-service training standards, to include frequency of retraining, for law-enforcement officers in the following subjects: (i) relevant state and federal laws; (ii) awareness of cultural diversity and the potential for bias-based profiling as defined in §

52-30.1

; (iii) de-escalation techniques; (iv) working with individuals with disabilities, mental health needs, or substance use disorders; and (v) the lawful use of force, including the use of deadly force, as defined in §

19.2-83.3

, only when necessary to protect the law-enforcement officer or another person;

Develop a uniform curriculum and lesson plans for the compulsory minimum entry-level, in-service, and advanced training standards to be employed by criminal justice training academies approved by the Department when conducting training;

Adopt statewide professional standards of conduct applicable to all certified law-enforcement officers and certified jail officers and appropriate due process procedures for decertification based on serious misconduct in violation of those standards;

Establish and administer a waiver process, in accordance with §§

2.2-5515

and

15.2-1721.1

, for law-enforcement agencies to use certain military property. Any waivers granted by the Criminal Justice Services Board shall be published by the Department on the Department’s website;

Establish compulsory training standards for basic training and the recertification of law-enforcement officers to include crisis intervention training in accordance with clause (ii) of §

9.1-188

;

Advise and assist the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, and support local law-enforcement cooperation, with the development and implementation of the Marcus alert system, as defined in §

37.2-311.1

, including the establishment of local protocols for law-enforcement participation in the Marcus alert system pursuant to §

9.1-193

and for reporting requirements pursuant to §§

9.1-193

and

37.2-311.1

; and

Perform such other acts as may be necessary or convenient for the effective performance of its duties.

History.

1981, c. 632, § 9-170; 1982, c. 473; 1984, cc. 515; 779; 1986, c. 128; 1988, cc. 46, 560; 1990, c. 632; 1991, c. 345; 1994, cc. 850, 905; 1996, cc. 154, 866, 952; 1998, cc. 31, 471, 523; 1999, cc. 307, 495; 2000, c. 561; 2001, cc. 162, 210, 434, 458, 844; 2002, cc. 490, 810, 818, 836, 868; 2004, cc. 397, 460, 972, 980, 1016; 2005, cc. 868, 881; 2006, cc. 203, 233, 857, 914; 2008, cc. 328, 600, 771; 2009, c. 715; 2010, c. 224; 2011, cc. 579, 635, 719, 821, 854; 2012, cc. 140, 159, 803, 827, 835; 2014, cc. 7, 158, 265; 2015, cc. 38, 205, 222, 223, 278, 402, 730; 2016, cc. 197, 235, 256, 481, 560; 2017, cc. 311, 758; 2019, cc. 366, 487, 488, 493; 2020, cc. 123, 184, 526, 535, 638, 1206, 1262; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 27, 32, 36, 37, 41, 42, 48, 55; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 467; 2022, cc. 45, 46.

Cross references.

As to disability and line of duty death benefits training for law-enforcement or public safety officers, see §

9.1-407

.

As to required course of instruction established by Department of Criminal Justice Services for deputy sheriffs, see §

15.2-1612.1

. As to implementation of protocols and policies for sexual assault response teams, see §

15.2-1627.4

. As to establishment of criminal justice training academies, see §

15.2-1747

.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the version of this section effective until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered
§

9.1-102

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 561, cl. 2 provided that the provisions of c. 561, which added former subdivision 41, would expire on July 1, 2005.

Acts 2001, cc. 162, 210, 434 and 458 amended former § 9-170,
from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2001, cc. 162, 210, 434 and 458 have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Acts 2002, cc. 810 and 818, cl. 2 provides: “That the Supreme Court shall establish reasonable judicial training regarding domestic violence and the resources available for victims in the Commonwealth of Virginia.”

Acts 2002, cc. 810 and 818, cl. 3 provides: “That the Commonwealth Attorney’s Services Council shall provide training to attorneys for the Commonwealth regarding the prosecution of domestic violence cases.”

Acts 2004, c. 397, which added subdivision 47, in cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act, except for §

9.1-186.14

, shall become effective on October 1, 2005.”

Acts 2004, c. 397, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.” See 6 VAC 20-260-120 et seq.

Acts 2004, c. 460, which added subdivision 46, in cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act, except for § 16.1-77, shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2004, cc. 972 and 980, cl. 3 provides: “That in establishing training standards and model policies regarding sexual assault for use by law-enforcement personnel pursuant to subdivision 37 of §

9.1-102

of the Code of Virginia, the Department of Criminal Justice Services shall include information on the impact of sexual assault on its victims, investigative techniques, the use of polygraph examinations in sexual assault cases, and the availability of forensic examinations in any instance where there is an allegation of sexual assault.”

Acts 2004, cc. 972 and 980, cl. 4 provides: “That a model policy for law-enforcement personnel in the handling of family abuse and domestic violence cases established pursuant to subdivision 37 of §

9.1-102

of the Code of Virginia shall include information on repeat offenders of family abuse or domestic violence.”

Acts 2004, cc. 972 and 980, cl. 5 provides: “That the Department of Criminal Justice Services shall promote the use of local and regional sexual assault response team policy and protocol, established pursuant to subdivision 46 [see now subdivision 45] of §

9.1-102

of the Code of Virginia, as an integral part of an effective coordinated community response to sexual assaults.”

Acts 2004, cc. 972 and 980, cl. 6 provides: “That the Office of the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court shall determine appropriate standards for the approval of education and treatment programs for persons accused of assault and battery against a family or household member pursuant to §

18.2-57.3

and arrange for such programs to be approved by an appropriate entity.”

Acts 2006, cc. 203 and 233, which added subdivision A 49, in cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be effective July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 108 provides: “That any regulations adopted by the Board of Towing and Recovery Operators being abolished by this act that are in effect before January 1, 2013, are hereby repealed as of that date. The Registrar of Regulations shall take appropriate administrative action to effect the repeal of the regulations in the Virginia Administrative Code.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 109 provides: “That the Board of Towing and Recovery Operators shall pay off its treasury notes and pay off or satisfy all of its other financial obligations no later than January 1, 2013.”

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts 2016, cc. 197 and 256, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2017.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “institutions of higher education within” was substituted for “with universities, colleges, community colleges, and other institutions, whether located in” in subdivision 12 to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 406 B 1 b, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “The Board of Criminal Justice Services, consistent with §

9.1-102

, Code of Virginia, and § 6 VAC-20-20-61 of the Administrative Code, shall not approve or provide funding for the establishment of any new criminal justice training academy from July 1, 2020, through June 30, 2022.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 406 B 1 c, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding subsection B.1.b. of this item, the Board of Criminal Justice Services may approve a new regional criminal justice academy serving the Counties of Clarke, Frederick, and Warren; the City of Winchester; the Towns of Berryville, Front Royal, Middletown, Stephens City and Strasburg; the Northwestern Adult Detention Center; and, the Frederick County Emergency Communications Center, to be established and operated consistent with a written agreement, provided to the Board, between the local governing bodies, chief executive officers, and chief law enforcement officers of the aforementioned localities, and the Rappahannock Regional Criminal Justice Academy. The new academy shall be eligible to receive state funding in a manner consistent with the currently existing regional criminal justice training academies. However, no current existing regional criminal justice training academy other than the Rappahannock Regional Criminal Justice Academy will receive less funding as a result of the creation of the new regional academy.”

Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 37, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 37, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Criminal Justice Services (the Department) shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of §§

2.2-5515

and

15.2-1721.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and of subdivisions 61 and 62 of §

9.1-102

and §

15.2-1707

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, within 280 days of the effective date of this act [March 1, 2021]. The Department shall report to the Chairman of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary and the Chairman of the House Committee for Courts of Justice by November 1, 2021, on the status of the regulations. In developing statewide professional standards of conduct pursuant to subdivision 61 of §

9.1-102

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which should be reviewed and approved by the Criminal Justice Services Board (the Board) before the Department promulgates them as regulations, the Department shall constitute a working group that includes individuals not serving on the Board that represent the following: crime victims, people directly impacted by the criminal justice system, people representative of communities disproportionately represented among persons incarcerated in Virginia jails and prisons, civil rights advocates, mental health advocates, defense counsel, and people employed in the criminal justice system, including police officials, sheriffs, attorneys for the Commonwealth, the judiciary, and correctional and rehabilitative agencies. A majority of the working group should be comprised of individuals who are not representative of people employed in the criminal justice system.”

Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, cc. 41 and 42, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services and the Department of Criminal Justice Services shall coordinate a public service campaign to run from July 1, 2021, until January 1, 2022, announcing the development and establishment of community care teams and mental health awareness response and community understanding services (Marcus) alert systems in localities and areas throughout the Commonwealth.”

Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, cc. 41 and 42, cl. 3 provides: “That this act shall be referred to as the Marcus-David Peters Act.”

Acts 2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 55, cl. 2, effective March 1, 2021, provides: “That the Department of Criminal Justice Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effect within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts
2022, c. 751, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2023.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 162 inserted “basic training and the recertification of” in subdivision 39.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 210, 434 and 458 are identical, and deleted “and” at the end of present subdivision 42, added present subdivision 44, and redesignated former subdivision 43 as subdivision 44 (further redesignated as subdivision 46 in 2002).

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 490 inserted “and the potential for biased policing” at the end of subdivision 39; inserted “including sensitivity to and awareness of cultural diversity and the potential for biased policing” at the end of subdivision 40; added present subdivision 41; and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 810 and 818 are identical, and inserted “and domestic violence” in subdivision 37, and substituted “community-policing” for “community policing” in subdivision 40.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 836 and 868 are identical, and deleted “and” at the end of present subdivision 44; inserted present subdivision 45; and redesignated the final subdivision.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 397, effective October 1, 2005, deleted “and” at the end of subdivision 45; inserted subdivision 48; and made related changes.

The 2004 amendment by c. 460, effective July 1, 2005, deleted “and” at the end of subdivision 45; inserted subdivision 47; and made related changes.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 972 and 980 are identical, and in subdivision 37, deleted “and” preceding “domestic violence” and inserted “sexual assault and stalking” near the end; inserted subdivision 46; and made related changes.

The 2004 amendment by c. 1016 added the language beginning “including standards for determining” at the end of subdivision 37.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 868 and 881 are identical, and rewrote the first sentence in subdivision 1; deleted former subdivision 36 which read: “Provide forensic laboratory services as detailed in Article 2 (§

9.1-117

et seq.) of this chapter”; and redesignated former subdivisions 37 through 49 as subdivisions 36 through 48.

The 2006 amendments.

Acts 2006, cc. 203 and 233, added subdivision A 48, which was subsequently renumbered as subdivision A 49 at the direction of
the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857 and 914 are identical, and added subdivision 48; redesignated former subdivision 48 as present subdivision 50; and made a related change.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 328 added subdivision 50; redesignated former subdivision 50 as subdivision 51; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 600 and 771 are identical, and inserted the last sentence of subdivision 36.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 715 added subdivision 51, redesignated former subdivision 51 as subdivision 52 and made a related change.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 224 added subdivision 52 and made related changes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 579 added subdivision 53 and redesignated former subdivision 53 accordingly.

The 2011 amendment by c. 635 added subdivisions 53 and 54, made a related change, and redesignated former subdivision 53 accordingly.
